Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB232.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 5 of this Act:
(1) "Addictive feed" means content recommended, selected, or prioritized for display
to a user based, in whole or in part, on information associated with that user or
the user's device, including but not limited to data gathered about the user's past
behavior, viewing history, interaction patterns, or demographic profile;
(2) "Minor" means an individual who is under the age of eighteen (18);
(3) "Nonaddictive feed" means a presentation of content to a user that is displayed:
(a) In a linear, chronological order based only on the time the content was
uploaded by accounts the user explicitly follows; or
(b) Only in response to a specific, nonprepopulated search query initiated by
the user;
(4) "Social media platform" means any public-facing internet website, web
application, or mobile application that:
(a) Is primarily used to connect with other users;
(b) Allows users to create, upload, and view content; and
(c) Has more than five hundred thousand (500,000) unique monthly users
located in the Commonwealth; and
(5) "Verifiable parental consent" means consent obtained through a commercially
reasonable method that requires the platform to obtain information that enables
the platform to reasonably ensure the individual providing consent is the minor's
parent or legal guardian.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 11/24/2025 7:10 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1118
(1) (a) A social media platform shall not provide a minor with an addictive feed
without first obtaining verifiable parental consent. Without a verifiable
parental consent, a social media platform shall only provide a nonaddictive
feed to a minor. Upon obtaining verifiable parental consent, a social media
platform may provide an addictive feed to the minor.
(b) A social media platform shall not deny access to its basic functionality or
service to any user solely because verifiable parental consent to use an
addictive feed has been withheld.
(2) A social media platform shall implement technical measures to prohibit the
sending of push notifications to a minor between the hours of 12 midnight and 6
a.m., unless the social media platform first obtains verifiable parental consent
allowing such notifications.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A social media platform shall use commercially reasonable and technically
feasible methods to determine the age of a user with a specified level of accuracy
upon account creation.
(2) Any personal information collected by a social media platform for the sole
purpose of determining age or obtaining verifiable parental consent shall:
(a) Not be used, retained, or disclosed for any other purpose, including
advertising, marketing, or behavioral profiling; and
(b) Be deleted or deidentified immediately after its intended use for age
verification or consent acquisition is complete.
(3) A social media platform shall not permit a minor to conduct any purchase or
engage in any financial transaction, including but not limited to in-app
purchases, microtransactions, or transferring funds, without an explicit, separate,
and verifiable parental consent for each transaction.
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 11/24/2025 7:10 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1118
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A social media platform shall develop and implement a proactive strategy to
prevent a known minor's exposure to harmful material, which includes content
that promotes, glorifies, or facilitates:
(a) Suicide, self-harm, or eating disorders;
(b) Substance abuse; or
(c) Stalking, bullying, or harassment.
(2) The proactive strategy required under subsection (1) of this section shall include
the use of filtering technology to block such harmful material from being
displayed to a known minor.
(3) (a) The Attorney General may enforce violations of Sections 1 to 5 of this Act.
(b) Any violation of Sections 1 to 5 of this Act shall be considered an unlawful
act under KRS 367.170.
(c) The Attorney General may initiate a civil action for a violation of Sections 1
to 5 of this Act and seek:
1. Up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the first violation;
2. Up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each subsequent violation;
and
3. Reasonable expenses incurred in investigating and preparing the case,
court costs, attorney's fees, and any other relief ordered by the court.
(d) In addition to enforcement by the Attorney General, a parent or legal
guardian of a minor who has been harmed by a violation of Sections 1 to 5
of this Act may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction
against a social media platform to obtain a declaratory judgment that the
platform is in noncompliance with Sections 1 to 5 of this Act.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 11/24/2025 7:10 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1118
READ AS FOLLOWS:
If any provision of Sections 1 to 5 of this Act or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of Sections 1 to 5 of this Act which can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to this end the provisions of Sections 1 to 5 of this Act are
severable.
Section 6. This Act may be cited as the Youth Online Safety Act.
Section 7. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 11/24/2025 7:10 AM Jacketed